Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 17 Roadblocks

Cross references. —

As to highways, see title 24.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Filling in the Blanks after Prouse: A New Standard for the Drinking-Driving Roadblock,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of routine roadblocks by state or local police for purpose of discovery of vehicular or driving violations, 37 ALR4th 10.

§ 7-17-101.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

7-17-101

through

7-17-103

:

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

;

“Temporary roadblock” means any device or means used by a peace officer to control all traffic through a point on any highway within the state whereby all vehicles may be slowed or stopped for the purposes defined in W.S.

7-17-102

;

“Highway” means as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(viii).

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 101, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-461; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of alcoholic intoxication — post-Sitz cases, 74 ALR5th 319.

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of illegal narcotics violations, 82 ALR5th 103.

§ 7-17-102.
Authority to establish.

Peace officers may establish, in their respective or adjacent jurisdictions, temporary roadblocks upon the highways within this state for the purpose of apprehending persons reasonably believed by the officers to be wanted for violation of the laws of this or any other state, or of the United States, and who are using any highway within the state.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 101, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-462; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-17-103.
Minimum requirements.

For the purpose of warning and protecting the traveling public, the following minimum requirements shall be met by peace officers establishing temporary roadblocks if time and circumstances allow:

The temporary roadblock shall be established at a point on the highway clearly visible at a distance of not less than two hundred (200) yards in either direction;

At the point of the temporary roadblock flashing warning lights shall be visible to oncoming traffic for a distance of not less than two hundred (200) yards. The display of flashing emergency warning lights on a marked law enforcement vehicle shall be sufficient under this paragraph; and

At least one (1) person working a temporary roadblock shall be in uniform and visible and at least one (1) vehicle used in a temporary roadblock shall be clearly marked as a law enforcement vehicle.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 101, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-463; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of illegal narcotics violations, 82 ALR5th 103.